Washington statutes.
RCW 44.16.050

Commission executed during recess.

Whenever such committee shall obtain authority for that purpose, from the senate or house, or legislature, by which it may be appointed, it may issue such commission to be executed during the recess of the legislature.

[ 1895 c 6 s 4; RRS s 8181.]